Hawaii statutes.
[§431P-15] Exemption from property
and liability insurance guaranty association; insolvency of fund.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, neither the fund
nor its policyholders shall be subject to the provisions of, or be eligible
for, the benefits provided in sections 431:16-101 to 117 inclusive. If the
total amount available at any time to the fund is insufficient to make all
necessary payments, the moneys available shall be prorated and the unpaid
portion shall be paid as soon thereafter as moneys become available. [L 1993, c
339, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next